Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 2451.
Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to complement the enforcement of federal statutes and decisions governing unfair methods of competition, unfair or deceptive acts or practices, and anti-competitive practices in order to protect the public and to encourage fair and honest competition.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

2011, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 18, 2012.

Particular cases.

As to homeowners’ Consumer Fraud Act claim, the trial court made precise findings concerning the parties’ knowledge of a defective carpet, its location, and the carpet company’s willingness to replace it. There was no reason to disturb the trial court’s determination that the company made no misleading statements to the homeowners regarding the carpeting. First Quality Carpets, Inc. v. Kirschbaum, 2012 VT 41, 191 Vt. 28, 54 A.3d 465, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 35 (2012).

Car buyer satisfied the elements for a claim under the Vermont Consumer Fraud Act. The dealer represented that the title was clear and erroneously certified an odometer reading; the buyer reasonably relied on the misrepresentations since nothing suggested he had reason to question the car’s title or the odometer’s accuracy; and the misrepresentations were material as they were closely linked to the vehicle’s longevity and value. Gregory v. Poulin Auto Sales, Inc., 2012 VT 28, 191 Vt. 611, 44 A.3d 788, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 28 (2012) (mem.).

Preemption.

Regardless of whether a lending bank acted willfully or with intent to injure, it was entitled to summary judgment in that federal Fair Credit Reporting Act preempted State law on issues of false credit reporting, precluding the borrower from asserting any such State law claim. Sprayregen v. Bank of Am., N.A., 2012 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 101910 (D. Vt. July 23, 2012).

Cited.

Cited in

Randolph National Bank v. Vail, 131 Vt. 390, 308 A.2d 588, 1973 Vt. LEXIS 321 (1973); Gramatan Home Investors Corp. v. Starling, 143 Vt. 527, 470 A.2d 1157, 1983 Vt. LEXIS 582 (1983); Barrett v. Adirondack Bottled Gas Corp., 145 Vt. 287, 487 A.2d 1074, 1984 Vt. LEXIS 592 (1984); Bruntaeger v. Zeller, 147 Vt. 247, 515 A.2d 123, 1986 Vt. LEXIS 392 (1986); State v. Custom Pools, 150 Vt. 533, 556 A.2d 72, 1988 Vt. LEXIS 232 (1988); Peabody v. P.J.'s Auto Village, Inc., 153 Vt. 55, 569 A.2d 460, 1989 Vt. LEXIS 232 (1989); Bridge v. Corning Life Sciences, Inc., 997 F. Supp. 551, 1998 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 3354 (D. Vt. 1998); Goldman v. Town of Plainfield, 171 Vt. 575, 762 A.2d 854, 2000 Vt. LEXIS 307 (2000) (mem.).

§ 2451a.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Consumer” means any person who purchases, leases, contracts for, or otherwise agrees to pay consideration for goods or services not for resale in the ordinary course of the person’s trade or business but for the person’s use or benefit or the use or benefit of a member of the person’s household, or in connection with the operation of the person’s household or a farm whether or not the farm is conducted as a trade or business, or a person who purchases, leases, contracts for, or otherwise agrees to pay consideration for goods or services not for resale in the ordinary course of the person’s trade or business but for the use or benefit of the person’s business or in connection with the operation of the person’s business.

“Goods” or “services” shall include any objects, wares, goods, commodities, work, labor, intangibles, courses of instruction or training, securities, bonds, debentures, stocks, real estate, or other property or services of any kind. The term also includes bottled liquified petroleum (LP or propane) gas.

“Seller” means a person regularly and principally engaged in a business of selling goods or services to consumers.

“Home solicitation sale” means the sale or lease, or the offer for sale or lease, of goods or services with a purchase price of $5.00 or more, whether under single or multiple contracts, where the sale, lease, or offer thereof is either personally solicited or consummated by a seller at the residence or place of business or employment of the consumer, or at a seller’s transient quarters, or solicited or consummated by a seller wholly or in part by telephone with a consumer at the residence or place of business or employment of the consumer. Transient quarters includes hotel or motel rooms, or any other place utilized as a temporary business location. The term “home solicitation sale” does not include a transaction:

Made pursuant to prior negotiations in the course of a visit by the consumer to a retail business establishment having a fixed permanent location where the goods are exhibited or the services are offered for sale on a continuing basis.

In which the consumer has initiated the contact and specifically requested the seller to visit the consumer’s home for the purpose of repairing or performing maintenance upon the consumer’s personal property. If, in the course of such a visit, the seller sells the consumer the right to receive additional services or goods other than replacement parts necessarily used in performing the maintenance or in making the repairs, the sale of those additional goods or services would not fall within this exclusion.

Conducted and consummated entirely by mail and without any other contact between the consumer and the seller prior to delivery of the goods or performance of the services.

With a purchase price of under $25.00 where the consumer is not required to sign any contract, receipt, sales ticket, evidence of indebtedness, or other writing, and the goods, services, or merchandise purchased are capable of delivery or performance at one time.

Pertaining to the sale or rental of real property, to the sale of insurance, to the sale of securities by a broker dealer registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or to the sale of commodities by any person registered with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.

Where, in the case of goods, the buyer may at any time:

cancel the order prior to delivery of the goods and receive a full refund for any monies paid;

(II)

refuse to accept the goods when delivered, without incurring any obligation to pay for them and receive a full refund for any monies paid; or

(III)

return the goods to the seller and receive a full refund for any monies paid;

the buyer’s right to cancel the order or return the goods without obligation or charge at any time and receive a full refund for any monies paid is clearly and unmistakably set forth on the face or reverse side of the sales ticket; and

the goods or merchandise purchased under an agreement meeting the requirements specified in subdivisions (i) and (ii) of this subdivision (F) are capable of delivery at one time.

Solicited or consummated wholly or in part by telephone where the seller offers a full refund and right of cancellation for at least ten days after receipt of the goods or services, and a full refund within 30 days of return of the goods or cancellation of the services or under terms no more restrictive than those set forth in subsections 2454(a), (c), and (d) of this title, and the right of refund and cancellation is conspicuously disclosed with the goods or services.

Solicited or consummated wholly or in part by a federally insured depository institution or its subsidiary, affiliate, or parent organizations, or by a public utility regulated by the Federal Communications Commission or the Vermont Public Utility Commission.

In response to an order placed by a farmer for farm-related goods or services, whether in person, by telephone, or otherwise, and the farmer has a preexisting open end credit plan with the seller.

“Business day” means any calendar day except Saturday, Sunday, or any day classified as a holiday under

1 V.S.A. § 371

.

“Purchase price” means the total price paid or to be paid for the consumer goods or services, including all interest and service charges.

“Lessor” means a person engaged in a business of leasing goods to consumers.

“Collusion” means an agreement, contract, combination in the form of trusts or otherwise, or conspiracy to engage in price fixing, bid rigging, or market division or allocation of goods or services between or among persons.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 7, 1974; amended

1985, No. 34

, § 1;

1985, No. 61

;

1993, No. 99

, § 3;

1995, No. 23

, § 1;

1997, No. 42

, § 1;

2001, No. 42

, § 2;

2011, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 18, 2012;

2021, No. 20

, § 16.

§ 2452.
Limitation.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to the owner or publisher of a newspaper, magazine, publication, or printed matter, or to a provider of an interactive computer service, wherein an advertisement or offer to sell appears, or to the owner or operator of a radio or television station that disseminates an advertisement or offer to sell, when the owner, publisher, operator, or provider has no knowledge of the fraudulent intent, design, or purpose of the advertiser or offeror, and is not responsible, in whole or in part, for the creation or development of the advertisement or offer to sell.

In this section, “interactive computer service” has the same meaning as in

47 U.S.C. § 230(f)

(2).

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

2015, No. 55

, § 9.

§ 2453.
Practices prohibited; antitrust and consumer protection.

Unfair methods of competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce are hereby declared unlawful.

It is the intent of the Legislature that in construing subsection (a) of this section, the courts of this State will be guided by the construction of similar terms contained in Section 5(a)(1) of the Federal Trade Commission Act as from time to time amended by the Federal Trade Commission and the courts of the United States.

The Attorney General shall adopt rules, when necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter, relating to unfair methods of competition in commerce and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce. The rules shall not be inconsistent with the rules, regulations, and decisions of the Federal Trade Commission and the federal courts interpreting the Federal Trade Commission Act.

Violation of a rule adopted by the Attorney General is prima facie proof of the commission of an unfair or deceptive act in commerce.

The provisions of subsections (a), (c), and (d) of this section shall also be applicable to real estate transactions.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 8, eff. April 4, 1969;

1969, No. 278

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 7, 1974;

1999, No. 65

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 8, 2012;

2011, No. 136

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a, eff. May 18, 2012;

2017, No. 74

, § 13.

Particular cases.

In a suit brought by a student forced to attend college classes on-line due to the college’s response to the COVID-19 pandemic, the college’s motion to dismiss was denied in part because the student’s claims did not challenge the quality of education he received, but rather alleged that he was deprived of certain educational services for which he contracted for and paid. Mooers v. Middlebury Coll., — F. Supp. 3d —, 2021 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 176354 (D. Vt. Sept. 16, 2021), dismissed in part, — F. Supp. 3d —, 2022 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 95129 (D. Vt. 2022).

While defendant’s marketing brochure advertised its flooring as a “spectacular, lifelike wood,” and natural wood floors did not develop blue-green spots all over them, as did the flooring here, this alone was not sufficient to demonstrate that the marketing brochure would mislead a reasonable consumer. The trial court ruled that the blue spots in the flooring were not the result of a manufacturing defect, and there was accordingly no evidence that defendant misrepresented its product in violation of the Vermont Consumer Protection Act. The Lofts Essex, LLC v. Strategis Floor and Decor Inc., 2019 VT 82, 211 Vt. 204, 224 A.3d 116, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 152 (2019).

Plaintiff had not stated a claim against defendant insurer under the Consumer Protection Act, as plaintiff was not a consumer with respect to the policy the insurer issued to defendant driver. Messier v. Bushman, 2018 VT 93, 208 Vt. 261, 197 A.3d 882, 2018 Vt. LEXIS 128 (2018).

In a landlord-tenant case, the trial court’s instructions as to the Consumer Protection Act were overbroad in not including the element of materiality in defining a deceptive act and in not requiring that the landlords knew or should have known of the alleged defect that they failed to disclose and that led to a fire. Terry v. O'Brien, 2015 VT 132, 200 Vt. 511, 134 A.3d 203, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 113 (2015).

As inn buyers clearly knew the information about the need to replace the roof, the realtor’s failure to provide the seller’s estimate of repair costs to them could not satisfy the requirements for liability under the Consumer Protection Act for purposes of a private cause of action. PH West Dover Prop. v. Lalancette Eng'rs, 2015 VT 48, 199 Vt. 1, 120 A.3d 1135, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 28 (2015).

Sale of a business did not constitute a transaction “in commerce” for purposes of the Vermont Consumer Fraud Act because it did not occur in the consumer marketplace. First, plaintiff held his offer out to defendant only, not to the public at large; second, the transaction did not involve products, goods, or services purchased or sold for general consumption; third, the transaction’s high level of customization did not typically occur in the consumer marketplace. Foti Fuels, Inc. v. Kurrle Corp., 2013 VT 111, 195 Vt. 524, 90 A.3d 885, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 117 (2013).

Sheriff’s office lacked constitutional standing to assert a predatory pricing claim against a police department that bid to provide police services to a town, as no commerce existed so as to provide the sheriff’s office with a legally protected interest. The provision of police services in Vermont occurred outside the realm of commerce because it involved no interchange of goods or commodities on the open market; it was a governmental function provided only by governmental entities for the benefit of the public. Franklin County Sheriff's Office v. St. Albans City Police Dep't, 2012 VT 62, 192 Vt. 188, 58 A.3d 207, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 61 (2012).

Real estate sellers’ Consumer Fraud Act claim failed because they failed to show that any alleged “misrepresentation” was material to the reasonable consumer or that there was any damage or injury attributable to the representation that a real estate commission would be split equally. There was no evidence that a reasonable seller of a small business would conclude that the greater incentive for the buyer broker was more important than a greater incentive for a seller broker or that the commission split affected the price for which the business was sold. Lang McLaughry Spera Real Estate, LLC v. Hinsdale, 2011 VT 29, 190 Vt. 1, 35 A.3d 100, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2011).

Real estate sellers’ Consumer Fraud Act claim failed when the parties’ listing agreement stated that the broker “recommended” mediation. Such a recommendation was not likely to mislead a reasonable consumer into believing that mediation was guaranteed, and the sellers’ interpretation that they had a right to mediation was unreasonable as a matter of law. Lang McLaughry Spera Real Estate, LLC v. Hinsdale, 2011 VT 29, 190 Vt. 1, 35 A.3d 100, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2011).

Court rejected real estate sellers’ assertion that a broker had a “practice” of claiming a commission on property not included in a listing agreement, and that this practice violated the Consumer Fraud Act. The sellers’ citation of a conditional statement made by the broker’s president did not suffice; the fact that the listing agreement was not as specific as it should have been did not alone demonstrate consumer fraud. Lang McLaughry Spera Real Estate, LLC v. Hinsdale, 2011 VT 29, 190 Vt. 1, 35 A.3d 100, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2011).

Even if a statement that any shortfall in a real estate broker’s commission would come out of the share of an employee who was the sellers’ friend violated the Consumer Fraud Act as an unfair debt collection practice, the sellers had not shown that they sustained damages or injury as a result. Lang McLaughry Spera Real Estate, LLC v. Hinsdale, 2011 VT 29, 190 Vt. 1, 35 A.3d 100, 2011 Vt. LEXIS 36 (2011).

Bankruptcy court denied a Chapter 12 trustee’s claims that a claim in the amount of $1,024,436 which a creditor filed against a debtor’s Chapter 12 bankruptcy estate should have been disallowed because the creditor violated the Vermont Consumer Fraud Act,

9 V.S.A. § 2453

, or, in the alternative, subordinated to other claims under 11 U.S.C.S. § 510(c). Evidence the trustee offered did not establish, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the creditor engaged in inequitable conduct and exercised an unfair advantage in business relations with the debtor, to the detriment of the debtor and unsecured creditors by: (1) extending a commercially unreasonable amount of credit to the debtor; (2) receiving confidential information from a lender regarding proposed refinancing with the debtor; (3) obtaining an ex parte attachment by providing false, incomplete, and misleading information to a state court; and (4) improperly seeking payment on several open accounts, including improper payment of attorney’s fees and interest. Bourdeau Bros. v. Montagne, 431 B.R. 94, 2010 Bankr. LEXIS 1665 (Bankr. D. Vt. 2010).

Bank was properly granted summary judgment on a customer’s claim under the Vermont Consumer Fraud Act. The bank had not led the customer to believe that a debt could be settled by payment of $150, but indicated only that it agreed to contact the collection agency to which the debt had been sold and repurchase it; moreover, there were no damages. Ianelli v. U.S. Bank, 2010 VT 34, 187 Vt. 644, 996 A.2d 722, 2010 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2010) (mem.).

Because deception can be found where there is no breach of contract or warranty, contract and common law defenses generally do not foreclose consumer-fraud claims. Thus, notwithstanding a provision in an automobile purchase agreement reading, “In the event the amount quoted by me or the holder of any lien covering the trade-in is not correct and the amount necessary to satisfy any such lien exceeds the amount taken into account in the obverse side of this Motor Vehicle Purchase Contract, I agree to pay such deficiency immediately upon demand thereof,” summary judgment for a truck dealership in an action by the truck buyers was inappropriate. Inkel v. Pride Chevrolet-Pontiac, Inc., 2008 VT 6, 183 Vt. 144, 945 A.2d 855, 2008 Vt. LEXIS 4 (2008).

Subsec. (b) of this section does not require that the State must follow the “indirect-purchaser” rule, set forth in a federal decision, which states that a party who does not purchase a product directly from an antitrust violator is barred from bringing a cause of action for overcharge against that violator. Elkins v. Microsoft Corp., 174 Vt. 328, 817 A.2d 9, 2002 Vt. LEXIS 314 (2002).

§ 2453a.
Practices prohibited; criminal antitrust violations.

Collusion is hereby declared to be a crime.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to apply to activities of or arrangements between or among persons that are permitted, authorized, approved, or required by federal or state statutes or regulations.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that in construing this section and subdivision 2451a(8) of this title, the courts of this State shall be guided by the construction of federal antitrust law and the Sherman Act, as amended, as interpreted by the courts of the United States.

Nothing in this section limits the power of the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney to bring civil actions for antitrust violations under section 2453 of this title.

A violation of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than $100,000.00 for an individual or $1,000,000.00 for any other person or by imprisonment not to exceed five years, or both.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 18, 2012; amended

2021, No. 20

, § 17.

§ 2453b.
Retaliation prohibited.

No person shall retaliate against, coerce, intimidate, threaten, or interfere with any other person who:

has opposed any act or practice of the person that is collusive or in restraint of trade;

has lodged a complaint or has testified, assisted, or participated in any manner with the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney in an investigation of acts or practices that are collusive or in restraint of trade;

is known by the person to be about to lodge a complaint or testify, assist, or participate in any manner in an investigation of acts or practices that are collusive or in restraint of trade; or

is believed by the person to have acted as described in subdivision (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 168

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 18, 2012.

§ 2454.
Purchase contracts; rescission.

Consumer’s or other obligor’s right to cancel.

Except as provided in subdivision (5) of this subsection, in addition to any right otherwise to revoke an offer, the consumer or any other person obligated for any part of the purchase price may cancel a home solicitation sale until midnight of the third business day after the day on which the consumer has signed an agreement or offer to purchase relating to such sale, or has otherwise agreed to buy consumer goods or services from the seller.

Cancellation occurs when notice of cancellation is given to the seller.

Notice of cancellation, if given by mail, shall be deemed given when deposited in a mailbox properly addressed and postage prepaid.

Notice of cancellation need not take the form prescribed and shall be sufficient if it indicates the intention of the consumer not to be bound.

A home solicitation sale may not be cancelled if the consumer has requested the seller to provide goods or services without delay because of an emergency, and:

the seller in good faith has begun substantial performance of the contract before the notice of cancellation has been given;

in the case of goods, the goods cannot be returned to the seller in substantially the same condition as when received by the consumer; and

the consumer’s request is both handwritten and signed by the consumer.

Disclosure obligations.

In every home solicitation sale, the seller shall furnish the consumer with a fully completed receipt or copy of any contract pertaining to such sale at the time the consumer signs an agreement or offer to purchase relating to such sale, or otherwise agrees to buy consumer goods or services from the seller. Such receipt or contract copy shall show the date of the transaction and shall contain the name and address of the seller, and in immediate proximity to the space reserved in the contract for the signature of the consumer or on the front page of the receipt if a contract is not used and in boldface type of a minimum size of 10 points, a statement in substantially the following form:

You, the buyer, may cancel this transaction at any time prior to midnight of the third business day after the date of this transaction.
See the attached notice of cancellation for an explanation of this right.

In a home solicitation sale, unless a consumer requests the seller to provide goods or services without delay in an emergency, the seller shall furnish a notice of cancellation to the consumer at the time he or she signs an agreement or offer to purchase relating to such sale or otherwise agrees to buy consumer goods or services from the seller, which notice shall be attached to the contract or receipt and easily detachable.

The notice of cancellation shall contain the following information and statements, printed in not less than 10-point boldface type:

Click to view

Before furnishing copies of the “Notice of Cancellation” to the buyer, the seller shall complete both copies by entering the name of the seller, the address of the seller’s place of business, the date of the transaction, and the date, not earlier than the third business day following the date of the transaction, by which the buyer may give notice of cancellation.

The seller shall leave the “Notice of Cancellation” with the consumer.

In addition to the written notice of cancellation the seller shall orally inform the buyer of his or her right to cancel at the time of the transaction.

Until the seller has complied with this subsection, the consumer or any other person obligated for any part of the purchase price may cancel the home solicitation sale by notifying the seller in any manner and by any means of his or her intention to cancel. The cancellation period of three business days shall begin to run from the time the seller complies with this subsection.

Restoration of payments.

Within 10 days after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the seller shall tender to the consumer any payments made by the consumer and any note or other evidence of indebtedness, and take any action necessary or appropriate to terminate promptly any security interest in the transaction, except as provided in subdivision (3) of this subsection.

If payment includes goods traded in, the goods shall be tendered in substantially as good condition as when received by the seller. If the seller fails to tender the goods as provided by this subsection, the consumer may elect to recover an amount equal to the trade-in allowance stated in the agreement.

Until the seller has complied with this subsection, the consumer may retain possession of goods delivered to him or her by the seller and shall have a lien on the goods in his or her possession or control for any recovery to which he or she may be entitled.

Duties of seller and consumer.

Within 10 days after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled or an offer to purchase revoked, the seller shall either demand possession of any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale or instruct the consumer regarding the return shipment of the goods at the seller’s expense and risk.

If the seller does not give instructions regarding the return shipment of the goods, or if the consumer does not comply with any such instructions given, the seller must pick up such goods within 20 days after a home solicitation sale has been cancelled.

If the seller does not act within the time periods established in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, the goods shall become the property of the consumer without obligation to pay for them.

Upon demand, the consumer shall tender to the seller any goods delivered by the seller pursuant to the sale but need not tender at any place other than his or her residence.

If the consumer agrees to return the goods to the seller and fails to do so, then he or she shall remain liable for performance of all obligations under the contract.

The consumer shall take reasonable care of the goods in his or her possession both before cancellation or revocation and for a reasonable time thereafter, during which time the goods are otherwise at the seller’s risk.

If the seller has performed any services pursuant to a home solicitation sale prior to its cancellation, the seller shall be entitled to no compensation therefor.

If the home solicitation sale is principally negotiated in a language other than English, then all of the disclosures required by this section shall be given in that language.

If the consumer is unable to write in his or her own handwriting, then any of the statements required to be written by him or her under this section shall be handwritten by a member of the consumer’s household at the request of the consumer. If there is no other member of the consumer’s household, then such statements must be written by the seller, at the request of the consumer, and the effect of such statements shall be orally explained to the consumer by the seller.

Use of the cancellation provision provided for in this section shall not prevent any other action being taken under this chapter or otherwise against such seller.

A violation of any of the provisions of this section shall be considered an unfair act in commerce within the meaning of subsection 2453(a) of this title.

NOTICE OF CANCELLATION =font8 (enter date of transaction)
(date) You may cancel this transaction, without any penalty or obligation, within three business days from the above date. If you cancel, any property traded in, any payments made by you under the contract or sale, and any negotiable instrument executed by you will be returned within 10 business days following receipt by the seller of your cancellation notice, and any security interest arising out of the transaction will be canceled. If you cancel, you must make available to the seller at your residence, in substantially as good condition as when received, any goods delivered to you under this contract or sale; or you may, if you wish, comply with the instructions of the seller regarding the return shipment of the goods at the seller’s expense and risk. If you do make the goods available to the seller and the seller does not pick them up within 20 days of the date of your notice of cancellation, you may retain or dispose of the goods without any further obligation. If you fail to make the goods available to the seller, or if you agree to return the goods to the seller and fail to do so, then you remain liable for performance of all obligations under the contract. To cancel this transaction, mail or deliver a signed and dated copy of this cancellation notice or any other written notice, or send a telegram, to at =font8
(name of seller)
(address of seller’s place of business) not later than midnight of =font8
(date) I hereby cancel this transaction.
=font8
(date)
=font8
(buyer’s signature)

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 1, eff. April 4, 1969;

1973, No. 110

, § 1;

1973, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 7, 1974.

§ 2454a.
Consumer contracts; automatic renewal.

A contract between a consumer and a seller or a lessor with an initial term of one year or longer that renews for a subsequent term that is longer than one month shall not renew automatically unless:

the contract states clearly and conspicuously the terms of the automatic renewal provision in plain, unambiguous language in bold-face type;

in addition to accepting the contract, the consumer takes an affirmative action to opt in to the automatic renewal provision; and

if the consumer opts in to the automatic renewal provision, the seller or lessor provides a written or electronic notice to the consumer:

not less than 30 days and not more than 60 days before the earliest of:

the automatic renewal date;

the termination date; or

the date by which the consumer must provide notice to cancel the contract; and

that includes:

the date the contract will terminate and a clear statement that the contract will renew automatically unless the consumer cancels the contract on or before the termination date; and

the length and any additional terms of the renewal period.

A seller or lessor under a contract subject to subsection (a) of this section shall:

provide to the consumer a toll-free telephone number, e-mail address, a postal address if the seller or lessor directly bills the consumer, or another cost-effective, timely, and easy-to-use mechanism for canceling the contract; and

if the consumer accepted the contract online, permit the consumer to terminate the contract exclusively online, which may include a termination e-mail formatted and provided by the seller or lessor that the consumer can send without additional information.

A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.

The provisions of this section do not apply to:

a contract between a consumer and a financial institution, as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 11101

, or between a consumer and a credit union, as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 30101

; or

a contract for insurance, as defined in

8 V.S.A. § 3301a

.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2019; amended

2019, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2455.
Defenses.

The holder of a promissory note or instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness of a consumer delivered in connection with a contract shall take or hold that note, instrument, or evidence subject to all defenses of such consumer that would be available to the consumer in an action on a simple contract, and all rights available to him or her under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 2, eff. April 4, 1969.

§ 2456.
Confession of judgment.

Any agreement of a consumer in a contract that a power of attorney is given to confess judgment, or an assignment of wages is given, or any agreement of similar effect, is void and of no force and effect on any party.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 3, eff. April 4, 1969.

§ 2457.
Evidence of fraud.

The failure to sell any goods or services in the manner and of the nature advertised or offered, or the refusal or inability to sell any goods or services at the price advertised or offered or in accordance with other terms or conditions of the advertisement or offer, creates a rebuttable presumption of an intent to violate the provisions of this chapter.
No actual damage to any person need be alleged or proven for an action to lie under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967.

§ 2458.
Restraining prohibited acts.

Whenever the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney has reason to believe that any person is using or is about to use any method, act, or practice declared by section 2453 of this title to be unlawful, or has reason to believe that any person has violated any assurance of discontinuance entered into pursuant to section 2459 of this title, and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the Attorney General, or a State’s Attorney if authorized to proceed by the Attorney General, may bring an action in the name of the State against such person to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of such method, act, or practice or to dissolve a domestic corporation or revoke the certificate of authority granted a foreign corporation. The action may be brought in the Superior Court of the county in which such person resides, has a place of business, or is doing business. The courts are authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of this chapter, such injunctions to be issued without bonds, and so to dissolve, or revoke the certificate of authority of, a corporation.

In addition to the foregoing, the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney may request and the court is authorized to render any other temporary or permanent relief, or both, as may be in the public interest, including:

the imposition of a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.00 for each unfair or deceptive act or practice in commerce and of not more than $100,000.00 for an individual or $1,000,000.00 for any other person for each unfair method of competition in commerce;

an order for restitution of cash or goods on behalf of a consumer or a class of consumers similarly situated;

an order requiring reimbursement to the State of Vermont for the reasonable value of its services and its expenses in investigating and prosecuting the action;

amounts other than consumer restitution recovered by the Attorney General or Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs under this chapter, but not to exceed amounts annually appropriated, or authorized pursuant to

32 V.S.A. § 511

, shall be deposited into special funds that shall be available to the Attorney General or Department of State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs, respectively, to offset the costs of providing legal services.

Whenever a State’s Attorney brings an action pursuant to this section, a copy of any pleadings shall be served on the Attorney General pursuant to Rule 5 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure. Failure to comply with this provision shall not affect the validity of the proceedings commenced under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 4, eff. April 4, 1969;

1971, No. 235

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1973, No. 110

, § 2;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1999, No. 49

, § 213;

2009, No. 67

(Adj. Sess.), § 88, eff. Feb. 25, 2010;

2015, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § D.1;

2019, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § E.200.2, eff. Oct. 2, 2020.

§ 2459.
Assurance of discontinuance.

In any case where the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney has authority to institute an action or proceeding under section 2458 of this title, in lieu thereof he or she may accept an assurance of discontinuance of any method, act, or practice in violation of this chapter from any person alleged to be engaged or to have been engaged in such method, act, or practice. Such assurance may include a stipulation for affirmative action by such person, payment of a civil forfeiture and the costs of investigation, or of an amount to be held in escrow pending the outcome of an action or as restitution to aggrieved consumers, or any of the above. Any such assurance of discontinuance shall be in writing and be filed with the Washington Superior Court. Evidence of a violation of such assurance shall be prima facie proof of violation of section 2453 of this title, or of any rule of regulation made pursuant to section 2453 of this title in any action or proceeding thereafter brought by the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney.

No assurance of discontinuance may be accepted by a State’s Attorney without the approval of the Attorney General, who shall indicate his or her approval by countersigning any assurance before it may become effective.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 132

, § 1, eff. April 17, 1967; amended

1969, No. 45

, § 5, eff. April 4, 1969;

1973, No. 110

, § 3;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.